South Dakota, session 2026, HB1082.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 13-35-2 be AMENDED:
13-35-2. The board of a school district may impose a charge for any meal provided
through the school district's food services program to:
(1) Any student other than a student who is eligible for free or reduced-price meals
through the National School Lunch Program, 42 U.S.C. § 1751, et seq. (January 1,
2026), or the School Breakfast Program, 42 U.S.C. § 1773 (January 1, 2026);
(2) An employee of the school district; or
(3) Any other individual, not otherwise exempted in accordance with section 2 of this
Act.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-35:
If a student is eligible for reduced-price meals through the National School Lunch
Program, 42 U.S.C. § 1751, et seq. (January 1, 2026), or the School Breakfast Program,
42 U.S.C. § 1773 (January 1, 2026), the board of a school district may not impose a
charge upon the student for any meals served by the district through the National School
Lunch Program or the School Breakfast Program.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 13-35:
On or before June thirtieth of each year, the department shall, based on
information forwarded by each school district, calculate the amount to be reimbursed by
the department for the cost of meals served to students who may not be charged,
pursuant to section 2 of this Act. The department shall:

26.219.17 2 1082
(1) Subtract the amount to be reimbursed to the district for each meal served to a
student eligible for reduced-price meals through the National School Lunch
Program, 42 U.S.C. § 1751, et seq. (January 1, 2026), or the School Breakfast
Program, 42 U.S.C. § 1773 (January 1, 2026), from the amount reimbursed to the
district for a meal served to a student eligible for free meals through either
program; and
(2) Multiply the difference of subdivision (1) by the number of meals served to students
who may not be charged, pursuant to section 2 of this Act.
The Department of Education shall, with moneys appropriated in the general
appropriation bill, reimburse each school district in accordance with this section.
HB1082 ENROLLED

26.219.17 3 1082
An Act to establish parameters for the reimbursement of school districts that provide free or
reduced-price meals to students.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1082
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1082 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1082 ENROLLED